extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX R Y 449
SFX R   rat         riem       [aeiou]rat is:1st_person
SFX R   rat         ries       [aeiou]rat is:2nd_person
SFX R   rat         rie        [aeiou]rat is:3rd_person
SFX R   rat         rieme      [aeiou]rat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   rat         riete      [aeiou]rat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   rat         ru         [aeiou]rat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   rat         ruc        [aeiou]rat is:participle
SFX R   rat         r          [aeiou]rat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   rat         rme        [aeiou]rat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   rat         rte        [aeiou]rat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   rat         eriem      [^aeiou]rat is:1st_person
SFX R   rat         eries      [^aeiou]rat is:2nd_person
SFX R   rat         erie       [^aeiou]rat is:3rd_person
SFX R   rat         erieme     [^aeiou]rat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   rat         eriete     [^aeiou]rat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   rat         eru        [^aeiou]rat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   rat         eruc       [^aeiou]rat is:participle
SFX R   rat         er         [^aeiou]rat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   rat         erme       [^aeiou]rat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   rat         erte       [^aeiou]rat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   dat         dim        dat is:1st_person
SFX R   dat         dis        dat is:2nd_person
SFX R   dat         di         dat is:3rd_person
SFX R   dat         dime       dat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   dat         dite       dat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   dat         dia        dat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   dat         diac       dat is:participle
SFX R   dat         di         dat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   dat         dime       dat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   dat         dite       dat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   nat         nim        nat is:1st_person
SFX R   nat         nis        nat is:2nd_person
SFX R   nat         ni         nat is:3rd_person
SFX R   nat         nime       nat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   nat         nite       nat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   nat         nia        nat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   nat         niac       nat is:participle
SFX R   nat         n          nat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   nat         nme        nat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   nat         nte        nat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   tat         tim        tat is:1st_person
SFX R   tat         tis        tat is:2nd_person
SFX R   tat         ti         tat is:3rd_person
SFX R   tat         time       tat is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   tat         tite       tat is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   tat         tia        tat is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   tat         tiac       tat is:participle
SFX R   tat         ti         tat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   tat         time       tat is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   tat         tite       tat is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   at          im         [^dnrt]at is:1st_person
SFX R   at          is         [^dnrt]at is:2nd_person
SFX R   at          i          [^dnrt]at is:3rd_person
SFX R   at          ime        [^dnrt]at is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   at          ite        [^dnrt]at is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   at          ia         [^dnrt]at is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   at          iac        [^dnrt]at is:participle
SFX R   zat         z          zat is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   at          me         [^dnrt]at is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   at          te         [^dnrt]at is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   at          al         at is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   at          al         at is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   at          al         at is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   at          ala        at is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   at          alo        at is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   at          ali        at is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   iect        eciem      iect is:1st_person
SFX R   iect        ecies      iect is:2nd_person
SFX R   iect        ecie       iect is:3rd_person
SFX R   iect        ecieme     iect is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   iect        eciete     iect is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   iect        ecu        iect is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   iect        ecuc       iect is:participle
SFX R   iect        ec         iect is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   iect        ecme       iect is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   iect        ecte       iect is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ct          kol        iect is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ct          kol        iect is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ct          kol        iect is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ct          kla        iect is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ct          klo        iect is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ct          kli        iect is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   lct         lciem      lct is:1st_person
SFX R   lct         lcies      lct is:2nd_person
SFX R   lct         lcie       lct is:3rd_person
SFX R   lct         lcieme     lct is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   lct         lciete     lct is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   lct         lcu        lct is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   lct         lcuc       lct is:participle
SFX R   lct         lc         lct is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   lct         lcme       lct is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   lct         lcte       lct is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ct          kol        lct is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ct          kol        lct is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ct          kol        lct is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ct          kla        lct is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ct          klo        lct is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ct          kli        lct is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   ct          zem        oct is:1st_person
SFX R   ct          zes        oct is:2nd_person
SFX R   ct          ze         oct is:3rd_person
SFX R   ct          zme        oct is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ct          zeme       oct is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ct          zte        oct is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ct          zete       oct is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ct          zu         oct is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   oct         ohol       oct is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   oct         ohol       oct is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   oct         ohol       oct is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   oct         ohla       oct is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   oct         ohlo       oct is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   oct         ohli       oct is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   ediet       iem        ediet is:1st_person
SFX R   ediet       ies        ediet is:2nd_person
SFX R   ediet       ie         ediet is:3rd_person
SFX R   ediet       ieme       ediet is:1st_person is:plural
SFX R   ediet       iete       ediet is:2nd_person is:plural
SFX R   ediet       edia       ediet is:3rd_person is:plural
SFX R   ediet       ediac      ediet is:participle
SFX R   ediet       edz        ediet is:2nd_person is:imperative
SFX R   ediet       edzme      ediet is:1st_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ediet       edzte      ediet is:2nd_person is:plural is:imperative
SFX R   ediet       edel       ediet is:1st_person is:past
SFX R   ediet       edel       ediet is:2nd_person is:past
SFX R   ediet       edel       ediet is:3rd_person is:masculine is:past
SFX R   ediet       edela      ediet is:3rd_person is:feminine is:past
SFX R   ediet       edelo      ediet is:3rd_person is:neuter is:past
SFX R   ediet       edeli      ediet is:3rd_person is:plural is:past
SFX R   liet        eliem      mliet is:1st_person
SFX R   liet        elies      mliet is:2nd_person
