extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
blacat/RN po:verb
blcat/RN po:verb
boliet/RN po:verb
brncat/RN po:verb
brucat/RN po:verb
bzucat/RN po:verb
chrapstat/RN po:verb
chripiet/RN po:verb
chrupstat/RN po:verb
civiet/RN po:verb
cucat/RN po:verb
cupiet/RN po:verb
cusat/RN po:verb
dobrat/RN po:verb
dodrzat/RN po:verb
dohrcat/RN po:verb
dohrnut/RN po:verb
dojest/RN po:verb
dokricat/RN po:verb
doletiet/RN po:verb
domliet/RN po:verb
domrziet/RN po:verb
doniest/RN po:verb
dopliest/RN po:verb
doprat/RN po:verb
doriect/RN po:verb
dosviedcat/RN po:verb
dotlct/RN po:verb
dovidiet/RN po:verb
doviezt/RN po:verb
dovraviet/RN po:verb
dozvediet/RN po:verb
drncat/RN po:verb
drzat/RN po:verb
duniet/RN po:verb
erdzat/RN po:verb
frcat/RN po:verb
fucat/RN po:verb
funiet/RN po:verb
gaudzat/RN po:verb
hladiet/RN po:verb
hrcat/RN po:verb
hrnut/RN po:verb
hucat/RN po:verb
hvizdat/RN po:verb
jacat/RN po:verb
jest/RN po:verb
kanut/RN po:verb
klast/RN po:verb
knucat/RN po:verb
kynut/RN po:verb
liezt/RN po:verb
minut/RN po:verb
moct/RN po:verb
mrziet/RN po:verb
nadist/RN po:verb
nadpriast/RN po:verb
najest/RN po:verb
naletiet/RN po:verb
namrziet/RN po:verb
napast/RN po:verb
napomoct/RN po:verb
nasediet/RN po:verb
natriast/RN po:verb
navliect/RN po:verb
nenavidiet/RN po:verb
obhoriet/RN po:verb
objest/RN po:verb
obliect/RN po:verb
obsediet/RN po:verb
ochripiet/RN po:verb
odhrnut/RN po:verb
odlezat/RN po:verb
odniest/RN po:verb
odpast/RN po:verb
odrat/RN po:verb
odsunut/RN po:verb
odviest/RN po:verb
odvraviet/RN po:verb
omiest/RN po:verb
opliest/RN po:verb
oprsat/RN po:verb
otriast/RN po:verb
panstiet/RN po:verb
pliest/RN po:verb
pobrat/RN po:verb
podmliet/RN po:verb
podpliest/RN po:verb
podrzat/RN po:verb
podvliect/RN po:verb
pohynut/RN po:verb
pokynut/RN po:verb
pomlcat/RN po:verb
poorat/RN po:verb
porast/RN po:verb
postat/RN po:verb
potrpiet/RN po:verb
povzniest/RN po:verb
prdiet/RN po:verb
predniest/RN po:verb
predsunut/RN po:verb
prehrmiet/RN po:verb
prejst/RN po:verb
preletiet/RN po:verb
premliet/RN po:verb
preobliect/RN po:verb
prepliest/RN po:verb
presediet/RN po:verb
pretlct/RN po:verb
previezt/RN po:verb
prezliect/RN po:verb
pribrat/RN po:verb
priletiet/RN po:verb
primysliet/RN po:verb
pripiect/RN po:verb
pririect/RN po:verb
pritlct/RN po:verb
privliect/RN po:verb
rapcat/RN po:verb
rinut/RN po:verb
rozhoriet/RN po:verb
rozhucat/RN po:verb
rozletiet/RN po:verb
rozmliet/RN po:verb
rozobrat/RN po:verb
rozozrat/RN po:verb
rozpomenut/RN po:verb
rozrast/RN po:verb
roztlct/RN po:verb
rozvinut/RN po:verb
rozzrat/RN po:verb
schrapcat/RN po:verb
sipiet/RN po:verb
skripiet/RN po:verb
slusat/RN po:verb
spiect/RN po:verb
spocinut/RN po:verb
sprat/RN po:verb
stiect/RN po:verb
strnut/RN po:verb
supiet/RN po:verb
svistat/RN po:verb
tenut/RN po:verb
trcat/RN po:verb
trpiet/RN po:verb
uhranut/RN po:verb
ulezat/RN po:verb
upliest/RN po:verb
uskrnut/RN po:verb
usviedcat/RN po:verb
utrpiet/RN po:verb
uzniest/RN po:verb
vediet/RN po:verb
viezt/RN po:verb
vliect/RN po:verb
vniest/RN po:verb
vovliect/RN po:verb
vrcat/RN po:verb
vrzdat/RN po:verb
vybrat/RN po:verb
vyhoriet/RN po:verb
vyhynut/RN po:verb
vykricat/RN po:verb
vyliezt/RN po:verb
vymysliet/RN po:verb
vypast/RN po:verb
vypomoct/RN po:verb
vypucat/RN po:verb
vysinut/RN po:verb
vysunut/RN po:verb
vytrpiet/RN po:verb
vyvliect/RN po:verb
vyzvediet/RN po:verb
vzniest/RN po:verb
zablacat/RN po:verb
zabucat/RN po:verb
zachrcat/RN po:verb
zacvendzat/RN po:verb
zadychcat/RN po:verb
zahladiet/RN po:verb
zahrnut/RN po:verb
zahynut/RN po:verb
zajojcat/RN po:verb
zakvicat/RN po:verb
zamecat/RN po:verb
zamraucat/RN po:verb
zamysliet/RN po:verb
zaorat/RN po:verb
zaprastat/RN po:verb
zarapcat/RN po:verb
zarucat/RN po:verb
zaskrecat/RN po:verb
zasmrdiet/RN po:verb
zasustat/RN po:verb
zatiect/RN po:verb
zavanut/RN po:verb
zavinut/RN po:verb
zavrcat/RN po:verb
zazrat/RN po:verb
zdrzat/RN po:verb
zhrnut/RN po:verb
zjacat/RN po:verb
zliezt/RN po:verb
zmoct/RN po:verb
zniest/RN po:verb
zomliet/RN po:verb
zosunut/RN po:verb
zriect/RN po:verb
zuniet/RN po:verb
zviest/RN po:verb
zvrestat/RN po:verb
